District of Columbia statutes.
16-1383

Availability of appropriations for purchases of excess property.

When real property is purchased pursuant to this subchapter in excess of that needed for a particular project or improvement, appropriations available for the payment of the purchase price, costs, and expenses incident to the project or improvement may be used in the payment of the purchase price, costs, and expenses of excess real property purchased in connection with the project or improvement, as provided by this subchapter.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 559, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(f)(13)

History

1981 Ed., § 16-1383.
1973 Ed., § 16-1383.

Prior Codifications